Virginia statutes. Title 64.2. Wills, Trusts, and Fiduciaries.
Article 1. Requisites and Execution.

§ 64.2-400.
Separate writing identifying recipients of tangible personal property; liability for distribution; action to recover property.

If a will refers to a written statement or list to dispose of items of tangible personal property not otherwise specifically bequeathed, the statement or list shall be given effect to the extent that it describes items of tangible personal property and their intended recipients with reasonable certainty and is signed by the testator although it does not satisfy the requirements for a will. Bequests of a general or residuary nature, whether referring only to personal property or to the entire estate, are not specific bequests for the purpose of this section.

The written statement or list may be (i) referred to as one that is in existence at the time of the testator’s death, (ii) prepared before or after the execution of the will, (iii) altered by the testator at any time, and (iv) a writing that has no significance apart from its effect on the dispositions made by the will. When distribution is made pursuant to such a written statement or list, a copy thereof shall be furnished to the commissioner of accounts along with the legatee’s receipt.

A personal representative shall not be liable for any distribution of tangible personal property to the apparent legatee under the testator’s will made without actual knowledge of the existence of a written statement or list, nor shall he have any duty to recover property so distributed. However, a person named to receive certain tangible personal property in a written statement or list that is effective under this section may recover that property, or its value if the property cannot be recovered, from an apparent legatee to whom it has been distributed in an action brought for that purpose within one year after the probate of the testator’s will.

This section shall not apply to a writing admitted to probate as a will and, except as provided herein, shall not otherwise affect the law of incorporation by reference.

History.

1995, c. 363, § 64.1-45.1; 2012, c. 614.

Law Review.

For 1995 survey of wills, trusts, and estates, see 29 U. Rich. L. Rev. 1175 (1995).

For article, “Wills, Trusts, and Estates,” see 35 U. Rich. L. Rev. 845 (2001).

Research References.

Virginia Forms (Matthew Bender). No. 15-101 Checklist for Will Interview, et seq.; No. 15-201 Preamble to Will, et seq; No. 15-301 Revocable Inter Vivos Trust Agreement, et seq.; No. 15-401 Checklist for Probate and Administration.

§ 64.2-401.
Who may make a will; what estate may be disposed of.

Except as provided in subsection B, any individual may make a will to dispose of all or part of his estate at his death that, if not disposed of, would otherwise pass by intestate succession, including any estate, right, or interest that the testator may subsequently become entitled to after the execution of the will.

An individual is not capable of making a will if he is (i) of unsound mind or (ii) an unemancipated minor.

History.

Code 1950, §§ 64-48, 64-49; 1968, c. 656, §§ 64.1-46, 64.1-47; 1972, c. 825; 2000, c. 161; 2012, c. 614.

Law Review.

For comment on contemporary legal aspects of surrogate mother agreements, see 16 U. Rich. L. Rev. 467 (1982).

For 2000 survey of Virginia wills, trusts and estates law, see 34 U. Rich. L. Rev. 1069 (2000).

§ 64.2-402.
Advertisements to draw wills prohibited; penalty.

Any person that advertises any direct or indirect offer to draw any will or have any will drawn is guilty of a Class 3 misdemeanor, provided that the provisions of this section shall not apply to a duly licensed attorney-at-law, partnership composed of duly licensed attorneys-at-law, or a professional corporation or professional limited liability company incorporated or organized for the practice of law so long as such attorney, partnership, or professional corporation conducts such advertisement in accordance with the Rules of Court promulgated by the Supreme Court of Virginia.

History.

Code 1950, § 64-50; 1968, c. 656, § 64.1-48; 1979, c. 438; 1996, c. 265; 2012, c. 614.

§ 64.2-403.
Execution of wills; requirements.

No will shall be valid unless it is in writing and signed by the testator, or by some other person in the testator’s presence and by his direction, in such a manner as to make it manifest that the name is intended as a signature.

A will wholly in the testator’s handwriting is valid without further requirements, provided that the fact that a will is wholly in the testator’s handwriting and signed by the testator is proved by at least two disinterested witnesses.

A will not wholly in the testator’s handwriting is not valid unless the signature of the testator is made, or the will is acknowledged by the testator, in the presence of at least two competent witnesses who are present at the same time and who subscribe the will in the presence of the testator. No form of attestation of the witnesses shall be necessary.

History.

Code 1950, § 64-51; 1968, c. 656, § 64.1-49; 2012, c. 614.

Law Review.

For survey of Virginia law on wills, trusts and estates for the year 1969-1970, see 56 Va. L. Rev. 1559 (1970).

for the year 1973-1974, see 60 Va. L. Rev. 1632 (1974).

for the year 1979-1980, see 67 Va. L. Rev. 369 (1981).

For 2002 survey of Virginia law on wills, trusts, and estates, see 37 U. Rich. L. Rev. 357 (2002).

For
article on 2007 and 2008 legislative and judicial developments in the areas of wills, trusts, and estates, see 43 U. Rich. L. Rev. 435 (2008).

For article, “Medical Malpractice Law,” see 45 U. Rich. L. Rev. 319 (2010).

§ 64.2-404.
Writings intended as wills.

Although a document, or a writing added upon a document, was not executed in compliance with §

64.2-403

, the document or writing shall be treated as if it had been executed in compliance with §

64.2-403

if the proponent of the document or writing establishes by clear and convincing evidence that the decedent intended the document or writing to constitute (i) the decedent’s will, (ii) a partial or complete revocation of the will, (iii) an addition to or an alteration of the will, or (iv) a partial or complete revival of his formerly revoked will or of a formerly revoked portion of the will.

The remedy granted by this section (i) may not be used to excuse compliance with any requirement for a testator’s signature, except in circumstances where two persons mistakenly sign each other’s will, or a person signs the self-proving certificate to a will instead of signing the will itself and (ii) is available only in proceedings brought in a circuit court under the appropriate provisions of this title, filed within one year from the decedent’s date of death and in which all interested persons are made parties.

History.

2007, c. 538, § 64.1-49.1; 2012, c. 614.

Law Review.

For
article on 2007 and 2008 legislative and judicial developments in the areas of wills, trusts, and estates, see 43 U. Rich. L. Rev. 435 (2008).

For article, “Medical Malpractice Law,” see 45 U. Rich. L. Rev. 319 (2010).

For article, “Irresolute Testators, Clear and Convincing Wills Law,” see 73 Wash. & Lee L. Rev. 3 (2016).

Research References.

Virginia Forms (Matthew Bender). No. 5-1401 Complaint to Establish Lost Will; No. 6-1001 Complaint to Impeach a Will, et seq.; No. 15-102 Simple Will Giving Entire Estate to One Beneficiary, et seq.; No. 15-431 Order of Probate of Will and Codicil, et seq.

§ 64.2-404.1.
Reformation of will to correct mistakes or achieve decedent’s tax objectives.

The court may reform the terms of a decedent’s will, or any codicil thereto, even if unambiguous, to conform the terms to the decedent’s intention if it is proved by clear and convincing evidence that both the decedent’s intent and the terms of the will were affected by a mistake of fact or law, whether in expression or inducement.

If shown by clear and convincing evidence, the court may modify the terms of a decedent’s will to achieve the decedent’s tax objectives in a manner that is not contrary to the decedent’s probable intention.

Notice must be given and a person may represent and bind another person in proceedings under this section to the same extent that a person may represent and bind another person in proceedings brought under §

64.2-733

or

64.2-734

relating to trusts.

The remedies granted by this section are available only in proceedings brought in a circuit court under the appropriate provisions of this title, filed within one year from the decedent’s date of death and in which all interested persons are made parties.

This section applies to all wills and codicils regardless of the date of their execution and all judicial proceedings regardless of when commenced, except that this section shall not apply to any judicial proceeding commenced before July 1, 2018, if the court finds that its application would substantially interfere with the effective conduct of the judicial proceeding or prejudice the rights of the parties.

History.

2018, c. 44.

Law Review.

For article, “Wills, Trusts, and Estates,” see 53 U. Rich. L. Rev. 179 (2018).

§ 64.2-405.
Interested persons as competent witnesses.

No person is incompetent to testify for or against a will solely by reason of any interest he possesses in the will or the estate of the testator.

History.

Code 1950, §§ 64-53, 64-54; 1962, c. 338; 1968, c. 656, § 64.1-51; 2012, c. 614.

§ 64.2-406.
Repealed by Acts 2016, c. 266, cl. 2.

Editor’s note.

Former §

64.2-406

, pertaining to when exercise of power of appointment by will valid, derived from Code 1950, § 64-52; 1968, c. 656, § 64.1-50; 2012, c. 614.

§ 64.2-407.
Will of personal estate of nonresidents.

Notwithstanding the provisions of §

64.2-403

, the will of a person domiciled out of the Commonwealth at the time of his death shall be valid as to personal property in the Commonwealth if the will is executed according to the law of the state or country in which the person was so domiciled.

History.

Code 1950, § 64-55; 1968, c. 656, § 64.1-53; 2012, c. 614; 2016, c. 266.

The 2016 amendments.

The 2016 amendment by c. 266 substituted “§

64.2-403

” for “§§

64.2-403

and

64.2-406

.”

Research References.

Harrison on Wills and Administration for Virginia and West Virginia (Matthew Bender). Chapter 1 Introductory.
§ 1.04 Conflict of Laws. Cox.

§ 64.2-408.
Presumption of formal execution of wills made by persons in military service; will of personal estate of persons in military service and seamen.

A will executed by a person while in the military service of the United States, as that term is defined in the Servicemembers Civil Relief Act (50 U.S.C. § 3901 et seq.), that purports on its face to be witnessed as required by §

64.2-403

, upon proof of the signature of the testator by any two disinterested witnesses, shall be presumed, in the absence of evidence to the contrary, to have been executed in accordance with the requirements of that section and shall be admitted to probate as if the formalities of execution were proved.

Notwithstanding the provisions of §

64.2-403

, a person while in the military service of the United States, or a seaman or mariner while at sea, may dispose of his personal estate in the same manner as he might heretofore have done.

History.

Code 1950, §§ 64-55, 64-56; 1968, c. 656, §§ 64.1-53, 64.1-54; 2012, c. 614; 2016, c. 266.

Editor’s note.

At the direction of the Virginia Code Commission, “50 U.S.C. § 3901 et seq.” was substituted for “50 U.S.C. app. § 501 et seq.”
to conform to the reclassification
of Title 50 U.S.C. Appendix.

The 2016 amendments.

The 2016 amendment by c. 266 substituted “§

64.2-403

” for “§§

64.2-403

and

64.2-406

” in subsection B.

§ 64.2-409.
Wills of living persons lodged for safekeeping with clerks of certain courts.

A person or his attorney may, during the person’s lifetime, lodge for safekeeping with the clerk of the circuit court serving the jurisdiction where the person resides any will executed by such person. The clerk shall receive such will and give the person lodging it a receipt. The clerk shall (i) place the will in an envelope and seal it securely, (ii) number the envelope and endorse upon it the name of the testator and the date on which it was lodged, and (iii) index the same alphabetically by name of both the testator and the executor then qualified in a permanent index that shows the number and date such will was deposited.

An attorney-at-law, bank, or trust company that has held a will for safekeeping for a client for at least seven years and that has no knowledge of whether the client is alive or dead after such time may lodge such will with the clerk as provided in subsection A.

The clerk shall carefully preserve the envelope containing the will unopened until it is returned to the testator or his nominee in the testator’s lifetime upon request of the testator or his nominee in writing or until the death of the testator. If such will is returned during the testator’s lifetime and is later returned to the clerk, it shall be considered to be a separate lodging under the provisions of this section.

Upon notice of the testator’s death, the clerk shall open the will and deliver the same to any person entitled to offer it for probate.

The clerk shall charge a fee of $5 for lodging, indexing, and preserving a will pursuant to this section.

The provisions of this section are applicable only to the clerk’s office of a court where the judge or judges of such court have entered an order authorizing the use of the clerk’s office for such purpose.

The clerk may destroy any will that has been lodged in his office for safekeeping under this section for 100 years or more.

History.

Code 1950, § 64-57.1; 1958, c. 392; 1964, c. 390; 1968, c. 656, § 64.1-56; 1970, c. 567; 2012, c. 614; 2019, c. 529; 2020, cc. 68, 589, 1063.

Editor’s note.

Acts 2020, c. 1063, cl. 2 provides: “That for any clerk of a circuit court that does not have an electronic program capable of indexing wills by the name of both the testator and the executor as of July 1, 2020, the provisions of this act shall become effective on July 1, 2022.”

Acts 2022, c. 109, cl. 1 provides: “§ 1. Pursuant to an order of the Rockingham Circuit Court in accordance with subsection F of §

64.2-409

of the Code of Virginia authorizing the clerk to lodge wills for safekeeping, the clerk of the Rockingham Circuit Court may establish a pilot project for an index of wills lodged for safekeeping, with a searchable database available to the public. Such database shall protect the privacy of information contained in wills so lodged with the clerk in accordance with §

17.1-293

of the Code of Virginia. The clerk shall pay all costs associated with the pilot project. The clerk shall make a written report of findings and recommendations regarding the pilot project to the Senate Committee on the Judiciary and the House Committee for Courts of Justice no later than November 1, 2026.”

The 2019 amendments.

The 2019 amendment by c. 529 added subsection G.

The 2020 amendments.

The 2020 amendments by cc. 68 and 589 are identical, and substituted “$5” for “$2” in subsection E.

The 2020 amendment by c. 1063, inserted “by name of both the testator and the executor then qualified” in subsection A.